Missouri, session 2026, HB3200.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.115, 137.180, 137.355, and 137.490, RSMo, are repealed and
five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.115, 137.121, 137.180,
137.355, and 137.490, to read as follows:
137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
town or district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section
137.078, the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third
percent of its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year. The assessor shall
annually assess all real property, including any new construction and improvements to real
property, and possessory interests in real property at the percent of its true value in money set
in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of any possessory interest in real
property in subclass (3), where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate airport
boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a
commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political subdivision,
shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such possessory interest in real
property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such real property completed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3200 2
after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned possessory interest,
regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or whether such costs were
considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property in the
following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January first of each odd-
numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same assessed values shall
apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction and property
improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of January first of
the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place of doing
business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and require the
person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county. On or before
January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the state tax commission for
their respective approval or modification. The county governing body shall approve and
forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by February first.
If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative to the plan to the state
tax commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
commission and the assessor and the governing body of the county involved are unable to
resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750,
the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing commission, by May first,
to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the county
involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county with a
charter form of government, or within a city not within a county, is made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported by clear,
convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the assessor at any
hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by generally
accepted appraisal techniques; and
(2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and the
address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means that:
(a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and

HB 3200 3
(b) Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed property,
except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property, the nearest
comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor plan, number of
rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
property assessment forms through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
the following percentages of their true value in money:
(1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
one percent;
(2) Livestock, twelve percent;
(3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
(4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years
old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
(5) Poultry, twelve percent;
(6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
135.200, twenty-five percent; and
(7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,
shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
then be delivered to the assessor.
5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016, shall be assessed
at the following percentages of true value:
(a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;
(b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and

HB 3200 4
(c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
(2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
100 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
101 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
102 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
103 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
104 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
105 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is
106 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
107 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
108 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
109 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
110 may be considered real property.
111 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
112 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
113 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
114 to the existing real estate parcel.
115 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
116 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
117 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
118 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the
119 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
120 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.
121 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
122 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
123 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
124 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
125 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax commission shall select and make
126 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and

HB 3200 5
127 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
128 issue of the publication selected by the state tax commission. The assessor shall not use a
129 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
130 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
131 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
132 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
133 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
134 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
135 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
136 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
137 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
138 was properly assessed in the previous year.
139 10. (1) Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of
140 subclass (1) real property by more than fifteen percent since the last assessment, excluding
141 increases due to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical
142 inspection of such property.
143 (2) In determining the true value in money of real property, a county assessor
144 may utilize aerial imagery, satellite imagery, geographic information systems (GIS),
145 unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs), oblique imagery, and other comparable technologies,
146 either alone or in combination with existing assessment methods, provided such
147 technologies are used in accordance with professionally accepted mass appraisal
148 standards.
149 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
150 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
151 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
152 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
153 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days to
154 notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
155 12. (1) A physical inspection, as required by subsection 10 of this section, shall
156 include, but not be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior
157 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may
158 reasonably and lawfully gain external access, and shall include an observation and review of
159 the interior of any buildings or improvements on the property upon the timely request of the
160 owner pursuant to subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-
161 by inspection or the like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection
162 as required by this section.

HB 3200 6
163 (2) However, the use of technology authorized under subdivision (2) of
164 subsection 10 of this section shall satisfy any inspection requirement for real property
165 assessment purposes and shall not require an on-site physical inspection unless
166 otherwise deemed necessary by the assessor. Nothing in this subdivision shall be
167 construed to prohibit an assessor from conducting an on-site inspection when
168 warranted, nor shall it limit a property owner's right to request a review or appeal of
169 an assessment.
170 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
171 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
172 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
173 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
174 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making
175 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
176 such electronic payment.
177 14. Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
178 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
179 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
180 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
181 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
182 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
183 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
184 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
185 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
186 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
187 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
188 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
189 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
190 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
191 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
192 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
193 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
194 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
195 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
196 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
197 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
198 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general

HB 3200 7
199 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
200 any year.
201 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
202 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
203 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
204 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such
205 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and
206 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
207 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
208 16. Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
209 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
210 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
211 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state tax
212 commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of tax
213 policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
214 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
215 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
216 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
217 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
218 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
219 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.121. 1. Assessors may create, maintain, and store assessment records,
property characteristics, valuation data, and supporting documentation in electronic
format, and such electronic records shall be deemed official records for all purposes
under Missouri law.
2. Assessors may establish an electronic notification and record delivery system
for assessment-related documents and notices.
3. Property owners may voluntarily opt in to receive assessment sheets, notices
of change, and other official communications by electronic means, including email or
secure electronic delivery.
4. Electronic notice and electronic record delivery adopted under the provisions
of this section shall have the same legal effect as delivery by mail and shall satisfy all
statutory notice requirements.
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property
he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner of such increase, [either] in person, [or] by
first-class mail directed to the last known address[;], or by electronic means, including
email or secure electronic delivery, provided the property owner has consented to

HB 3200 8
electronic delivery or has supplied an email address to the assessor's office. Electronic
notice delivered in compliance with this subsection shall satisfy all statutory notice
requirements. Every such increase in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be
subject to review by the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled
to be heard, and the notice to the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a charter form of government, other
than any county adopting a charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to
result from such an increase, [either] in person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last
known address, or by electronic means under the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section; every such increase in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to
review by the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be
heard, and the notice to the landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
4 and 5 of this section from the state tax commission, for any county not subject to the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase
[either] in person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last known address, or electronic
means under the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, and include in such notice a
statement indicating that the change in assessed value may impact the record owner's tax
liability and provide all processes and deadlines for appealing determinations of the assessed
value of such property. Such notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to alert a
record owner of the potential impact upon tax liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5 of this
section from the state tax commission, for all counties not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any assessor shall
increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county
shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase, [either] in person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last known address, or
electronic means under the provisions of subsection 1 of this section; every such increase

HB 3200 9
in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by the county board of
equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the
landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the county shall
accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsections 2 and 4 of this
section, from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this
section, effective January 1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and with
more than one million inhabitants, whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner of any
change in assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that information regarding the
assessment method and computation of value for such property is available on the assessor's
website and provide the exact website address at which such information may be accessed.
Such notification shall provide the assessor's contact information to enable taxpayers without
internet access to request and receive information regarding the assessment method and
computation of value for such property.
7. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation notices, and other official
communications electronically upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No
property owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and paper notice shall be
provided upon request.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of any tangible personal property as
estimated in the itemized list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases the
valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner of the

HB 3200 10
increase [either] in person [or],by first-classmail directed to the last known address, [and] or
by electronic means, including email or secure electronic delivery, provided the property
owner has consented to electronic delivery or has supplied an email address to the
assessor's office. Electronic notice delivered in compliance with this subsection shall
satisfy all statutory notice requirements. If the address of the owner is unknown notice
shall be given by publication in two newspapers published in the county.
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
3 and 4 of this section from the state tax commission, whenever any assessor shall increase
the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner on or
before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase [either] in person, [or]
by first-class mail directed to the last known address, or by electronic means under the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section, and include on the face of such notice, in no less
than twelve-point font, the following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE HAS INCREASED, IT
MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER
THIRTY-FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF YOUR PROPERTY
HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______
(INSERT DATE BY WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4 of this
section from the state tax commission, if an assessor increases the valuation of any real
property, the assessor, on or before June fifteenth, shall notify the record owner of the
increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the
projected tax liability likely to result from such an increase [either] in person [or], by first-
class mail directed to the last known address, or by electronic means under the provisions
of subsection 1 of this section, and, if the address of the owner is unknown, notice shall be
given by publication in two newspapers published in the county. Notice of the projected tax
liability from the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsection 3 of this section,
from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;

HB 3200 11
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.
5. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation notices, and other official
communications electronically upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No
property owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and paper notice shall be
provided upon request.
137.490. 1. The assessor, or his deputies under his direction, shall assess all the
taxable real property within the city and all tangible personal property taxable by the city
under the laws of this state in the manner provided in sections 137.485 to 137.550 and as
otherwise provided by law, and for that purpose the assessor may divide and assign the work
or any of it among them. They shall commence their assessment on the first day of January in
each year and complete the assessment, and the deputies make their final reports thereof to
the assessor, on or before the first day of July next following. The assessor shall see that the
assessment is made uniform and equal throughout the city. If the assessor proposes to
increase any assessment of real property, he or she shall give notice of the fact to the person
owning the property affected, his or her agent or representative, by personal notice, [or] by
first-class mail directed to the last known address, or by electronic means, including email
or secure electronic delivery, provided the property owner has consented to electronic
delivery or has supplied an email address to the assessor's office. Electronic notice
delivered in compliance with this subsection shall satisfy all statutory notice
requirements.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, the assessor, or his or her deputies under his or her
direction, shall commence their assessment on the first day of January in each year and
complete the assessment, and the deputies make their final reports thereof to the assessor, on
or before the first day of March next following. The assessor shall see that the assessment is
made uniform and equal throughout the city. If the assessor proposes to increase any
assessment of real property, the assessor shall, on or before the fifteenth day of June, give
notice of the fact and, in a year of general reassessment, the city shall provide notice of the
projected tax liability likely to result from such an increase to the person owning the property

HB 3200 12
affected, his or her agent or representative, by personal notice, [or] by first-class mail
directed to the last known address, or by electronic means under the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section. Notice of the projected tax liability from the city shall
accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
3. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsection 2 of this section,
from the city shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.
4. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation notices, and other official
communications electronically upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No
property owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and paper notice shall be
provided upon request.
✔